Massachusetts, session 194th, S1508.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the executive
office of health and human services shall establish an Amputation Prevention Task Force.
The secretary or designee will chair the task force and will make recommendations for
task force membership. Members not serving in the General Court will be appointed by the
governor. The governor shall ensure that appointments provide diversity of gender, race, and
geographical areas.
The task force shall consist of the following members:
Commissioner of the department of public health or a designee, Assistant Secretary for
MassHealth or a designee, 2 members from the Massachusetts House of Representatives as
appointed by the Speaker of the House, 2 members from the Massachusetts Senate as appointed
by the Senate President, 1 licensed endocrinologist, 1 licensed diabetes nurse educator, 1
vascular surgeon who has expertise in amputation prevention, 1 medical doctor or midlevel
of 2

practitioner who has expertise in amputation prevention, 1 podiatrist with expertise in treating
diabetic foot ulcers, 1 podiatrist or vascular surgeon with the veterans administration, 1 public
health provider, 1 representative of the Massachusetts Senior Care Association, 1 member of the
public, 1 representative of the American Diabetes Association, and the task force may add
members as it sees fit by a majority vote of the task force members.
SECTION 2. Duties.
The task force shall: (1) advise the secretary and other state agencies on issues related to
amputations with a focus on amputation prevention as it relates to diabetic foot ulcers and
peripheral arterial disease; (2) provide a systematic and cohesive approach toward reducing
amputations, including increasing public awareness; (3) recommend mechanisms to encourage
greater cooperation among stakeholders to address amputations in Massachusetts; (4) make
recommendations and identify policy solutions to the state legislature to ensure access to
treatments to prevent amputations including: (a) Coverage policies as it relates to treatment of
diabetic foot ulcers including topical oxygen therapy; (b) Policies to address timely and equitable
access to evidence-supported medical tools, technologies, and services to prevent avoidable
amputations; (c) Improve and incentivize quality care to avoid amputations whenever possible;
(d) Policies to promote collaboration; (5) The task force shall publish a report and present it to
the Governor, the clerks of the House of Representatives and Senate, and the chairs of the Joint
Committees on Public Health, Health Care Financing, and Financial Services by no later than
September 1 of the year following passage into law.
of 2